New York, session 2025-2026, A2253.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 3351 of the public health 2 law, as amended by chapter 511 of the laws of 2025, are amended to read 3 as follows: 4 1. Controlled substances may be prescribed for, or administered or 5 dispensed to a person with substance use disorder or habitual user: 6 (a) during emergency medical treatment unrelated to [abuse] such 7 substance use disorder or habitual use of controlled substances; 8 (b) who is a bona fide patient suffering from an incurable and fatal 9 disease such as cancer or advanced tuberculosis; 10 (c) who is aged, infirm, or suffering from serious injury or illness 11 and the withdrawal from controlled substances would endanger the life or 12 impede or inhibit the recovery of such person. 13 2. Controlled substances may be ordered for use by a person with 14 substance use disorder or habitual user by a practitioner and adminis- 15 tered by a practitioner [or], registered nurse, or emergency medical 16 technician-paramedic, acting within their scope of practice, to relieve 17 acute withdrawal symptoms. 18 § 2. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 3351 of the public health law, as 19 separately amended by chapters 511 and 546 of the laws of 2025, are 20 amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05629-02-6 A. 2253--A 2 1 1. Controlled substances may be prescribed for, or administered or 2 dispensed to a person with substance use disorder or habitual user: 3 (a) during emergency medical treatment unrelated to [abuse] such 4 substance use disorder or habitual use of controlled substances; 5 (b) who is a bona fide patient suffering from an incurable and fatal 6 disease such as cancer or advanced tuberculosis; 7 (c) who is aged, infirm, or suffering from serious injury or illness 8 and the withdrawal from controlled substances would endanger the life or 9 impede or inhibit the recovery of such person. 10 2. Controlled substances may be ordered for use by a person with 11 substance use disorder or habitual user by a practitioner and adminis- 12 tered by a practitioner [or], registered nurse, or emergency medical 13 technician-paramedic, acting within their scope of practice, to relieve 14 acute withdrawal symptoms. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 16 section two of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 17 same manner as section 2 of chapter 546 of the laws of 2025, takes 18 effect.